Utah statutes.
48-2c-105 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Purpose.

Except as provided in Subsection 48-2c-102(2) or in Part 15 of this chapter, each company formed under this chapter has the purpose of engaging in any business unless a more limited purpose is set forth in its articles of organization.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

